District of Columbia statutes.
26-504

Repeal of District of Columbia Credit Unions Act.

Effective 30 days after August 1, 1964, the District of Columbia Credit Unions Act (47 Stat. 326) [P.L. 72-190], as amended, is repealed and all organization certificates issued thereunder and still in force are revoked.

Aug. 1, 1964, 78 Stat. 377, Pub. L. 88-395, § 4
1981 Ed., § 26-604.
1973 Ed., § 26-522.